Missouri, session 2026, HB1976.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 338.010, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 338.010, to read as follows:
338.010. 1. The "practice of pharmacy" includes:
(1) The interpretation, implementation, and evaluation of medical prescription orders,
including any legend drugs under 21 U.S.C. Section 353, and the receipt, transmission, or
handling of such orders or facilitating the dispensing of such orders;
(2) The designing, initiating, implementing, and monitoring of a medication
therapeutic plan in accordance with the provisions of this section;
(3) The compounding, dispensing, labeling, and administration of drugs and devices
pursuant to medical prescription orders;
(4) The ordering and administration of vaccines approved or authorized by the U.S.
Food and Drug Administration, excluding vaccines for cholera, monkeypox, Japanese
encephalitis, typhoid, rabies, yellow fever, tick-borne encephalitis, anthrax, tuberculosis,
dengue, Hib, polio, rotavirus, smallpox, and any vaccine [approved after January 1, 2023]
that is jointly excluded by joint rules promulgated by the board of pharmacy and the
state board of registration for the healing arts, to persons at least seven years of age or the
age recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, whichever is older,
pursuant to joint promulgation of rules established by the board of pharmacy and the state
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1976 2
board of registration for the healing arts unless rules are established under a state of
emergency as described in section 44.100;
(5) The participation in drug selection according to state law and participation in drug
utilization reviews;
(6) The proper and safe storage of drugs and devices and the maintenance of proper
records thereof;
(7) Consultation with patients and other health care practitioners, and veterinarians
and their clients about legend drugs, about the safe and effective use of drugs and devices;
(8) The prescribing and dispensing of any nicotine replacement therapy product under
section 338.665;
(9) The dispensing of HIV postexposure prophylaxis pursuant to section 338.730; and
(10) The offering or performing of those acts, services, operations, or transactions
necessary in the conduct, operation, management and control of a pharmacy.
2. No person shall engage in the practice of pharmacy unless he or she is licensed
under the provisions of this chapter.
3. This chapter shall not be construed to prohibit the use of auxiliary personnel under
the direct supervision of a pharmacist from assisting the pharmacist in any of his or her duties.
This assistance in no way is intended to relieve the pharmacist from his or her responsibilities
for compliance with this chapter and he or she will be responsible for the actions of the
auxiliary personnel acting in his or her assistance.
4. This chapter shall not be construed to prohibit or interfere with any legally
registered practitioner of medicine, dentistry, or podiatry, or veterinary medicine only for use
in animals, or the practice of optometry in accordance with and as provided in sections
195.070 and 336.220 in the compounding, administering, prescribing, or dispensing of his or
her own prescriptions.
5. A pharmacist with a certificate of medication therapeutic plan authority may
provide medication therapy services pursuant to a written protocol from a physician licensed
under chapter 334 to patients who have established a physician-patient relationship, as
described in subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 191.1146, with the protocol physician.
The written protocol authorized by this section shall come only from the physician and shall
not come from a nurse engaged in a collaborative practice arrangement under section
334.104, or from a physician assistant engaged in a collaborative practice arrangement under
section 334.735.
6. Nothing in this section shall be construed as to prevent any person, firm or
corporation from owning a pharmacy regulated by sections 338.210 to 338.315, provided that
a licensed pharmacist is in charge of such pharmacy.

HB 1976 3
7. Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to or interfere with the sale of
nonprescription drugs and the ordinary household remedies and such drugs or medicines as
are normally sold by those engaged in the sale of general merchandise.
8. No health carrier as defined in chapter 376 shall require any physician with which
they contract to enter into a written protocol with a pharmacist for medication therapeutic
services.
9. This section shall not be construed to allow a pharmacist to diagnose or
independently prescribe pharmaceuticals.
10. The state board of registration for the healing arts, under section 334.125, and the
state board of pharmacy, under section 338.140, shall jointly promulgate rules regulating the
use of protocols for medication therapy services. Such rules shall require protocols to include
provisions allowing for timely communication between the pharmacist and the protocol
physician or similar body authorized by this section, and any other patient protection
provisions deemed appropriate by both boards. In order to take effect, such rules shall be
approved by a majority vote of a quorum of each board. Neither board shall separately
promulgate rules regulating the use of protocols for medication therapy services. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to
chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after August 28, 2007, shall be invalid and void.
11. The state board of pharmacy may grant a certificate of medication therapeutic
plan authority to a licensed pharmacist who submits proof of successful completion of a
board-approved course of academic clinical study beyond a bachelor of science in pharmacy,
including but not limited to clinical assessment skills, from a nationally accredited college or
university, or a certification of equivalence issued by a nationally recognized professional
organization and approved by the board of pharmacy.
12. Any pharmacist who has received a certificate of medication therapeutic plan
authority may engage in the designing, initiating, implementing, and monitoring of a
medication therapeutic plan as defined by a written protocol from a physician that may be
specific to each patient for care by a pharmacist.
13. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow a pharmacist to make a
therapeutic substitution of a pharmaceutical prescribed by a physician unless authorized by
the written protocol or the physician's prescription order.

HB 1976 4
14. "Veterinarian", "doctor of veterinary medicine", "practitioner of veterinary
medicine", "DVM", "VMD", "BVSe", "BVMS", "BSe (Vet Science)", "VMB", "MRCVS", or
an equivalent title means a person who has received a doctor's degree in veterinary medicine
from an accredited school of veterinary medicine or holds an Educational Commission for
Foreign Veterinary Graduates (EDFVG) certificate issued by the American Veterinary
Medical Association (AVMA).
15. In addition to other requirements established by the joint promulgation of rules by
the board of pharmacy and the state board of registration for the healing arts:
(1) A pharmacist shall administer vaccines by protocol in accordance with treatment
guidelines established by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC);
(2) A pharmacist who is administering a vaccine shall request a patient to remain in
100 the pharmacy a safe amount of time after administering the vaccine to observe any adverse
101 reactions. Such pharmacist shall have adopted emergency treatment protocols.
102 16. In addition to other requirements by the board, a pharmacist shall receive
103 additional training as required by the board and evidenced by receiving a certificate from the
104 board upon completion, and shall display the certification in his or her pharmacy where
105 vaccines are delivered.
106 17. A pharmacist shall inform the patient that the administration of a vaccine will be
107 entered into the ShowMeVax system, as administered by the department of health and senior
108 services. The patient shall attest to the inclusion of such information in the system by signing
109 a form provided by the pharmacist. If the patient indicates that he or she does not want such
110 information entered into the ShowMeVax system, the pharmacist shall provide a written
111 report within fourteen days of administration of a vaccine to the patient's health care provider,
112 if provided by the patient, containing:
113 (1) The identity of the patient;
114 (2) The identity of the vaccine or vaccines administered;
115 (3) The route of administration;
116 (4) The anatomic site of the administration;
117 (5) The dose administered; and
118 (6) The date of administration.
119 18. A pharmacist licensed under this chapter may order and administer vaccines
120 approved or authorized by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration to address a public health
121 need, as lawfully authorized by the state or federal government, or a department or agency
122 thereof, during a state or federally declared public health emergency.
✔